Utah statutes.
70A-2-512.   Payment by buyer before inspection.

(1)  Where the contract requires payment before inspection, nonconformity of the goods does not excuse the buyer from so making payment unless:

(a)  the nonconformity appears without inspection; or

(b)  despite tender of the required documents the circumstances would justify injunction against honor under the provisions under Subsection 70A-5-109(2).

(2)  Payment pursuant to Subsection (1) does not constitute an acceptance of goods or impair the buyer's right to inspect or any of his remedies.

